Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4151.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 162.375 is amended to read:
162.375. (1) A person commits the crime of initiating a false report if the person knowingly ini-
tiates a false alarm or report that is transmitted to a fire department, law enforcement agency or
other organization that deals with emergencies involving danger to life or property.
(2)(a) Initiating a false report is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, initiating a false report is a Class
C felony if the false report is of such nature that the person initiating the report inten-
tionally causes the deployment of an enhanced law enforcement response and recklessly
causes serious physical injury to or the death of another person as a result of the enhanced
law enforcement response.
(3) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall classify initiating a false report as
described in subsection (2)(b) of this section as a person felony under the rules of the com-
mission.
[(3)(a)] (4) The court shall include in the sentence of any person convicted under this section a
requirement that the person repay the costs incurred in responding to and investigating the false
report.
[(b) If the response to the false report involved the deployment of a law enforcement special weap-
ons and tactics (SWAT) team or a similar law enforcement group, the court shall impose, and may not
suspend, a term of incarceration of:]
[(A) At least 10 days.]
[(B) At least 30 days if the deployment resulted in death or serious physical injury to another
person.]
(5) As used in this section, “enhanced law enforcement response” means a response by
a law enforcement agency that, based on the information received, involves the dispatch of
two or more officers or units and one or more of the following:
(a) The dispatch of specialized or tactical teams;
(b) The establishment of a perimeter, the evacuation of bystanders or restriction of
public access;
Enrolled House Bill 4151 (HB 4151-A) Page 1

(c) The use or deployment of specialized equipment, including armored vehicles, breach-
ing tools or aircraft; or
(d) The initiation of emergency procedures such as a shelter-in-place directive or the
activation of rapid response protocols.
Passed by House February 19, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate March 5, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4151 (HB 4151-A) Page 2